en: Alabama, US-AL
af: Alabama
am: አላባማ
an: Alabama
ar: ألاباما
ay: Alabama suyu
az: Alabama
ba: Алабама
be: Алабама
bg: Алабама
bh: अलबामा
bi: Alabama
bn: অ্যালাবামা
bo: ཨ་ལ་པ་མ།
br: Alabama
bs: Alabama
ca: Alabama
ce: Алабама
co: Alabama
cs: Alabama
cv: Алабама
cy: Alabama
da: Alabama
de: Alabama
el: Αλαμπάμα
eo: Alabamo
es: Alabama
et: Alabama
eu: Alabama
fa: آلاباما
fi: Alabama
fo: Alabama
fr: Alabama
fy: Alabama
ga: Alabama
gd: Alabama
gl: Alabama
gn: Alaváma
gu: અલાબામા
gv: Alabama
ha: Alabama
he: אלבמה
hi: अलबामा
hr: Alabama
ht: Alabama
hu: Alabama
hy: Ալաբամա
ia: Alabama
id: Alabama
ie: Alabama
ig: Alabama
ik: Alapaama
io: Alabama
is: Alabama
it: Alabama
iu: ᐋᓛᐹᒫ
ja: アラバマ州
jv: Alabama
ka: ალაბამა
kk: Алабама
kn: ಅಲಬಾಮ
ko: 앨라배마주
ku: Alabama
kw: Alabama
ky: Алабама
la: Alabama
lb: Alabama
li: Alabama
lt: Alabama
lv: Alabama
mg: Alabama
mi: Arapama
mk: Алабама
ml: അലബാമ
mn: Алабама
mr: अलाबामा
ms: Alabama
my: အလာဘားမားပြည်နယ်
ne: अलाबामा
nl: Alabama
nn: Alabama
no: Alabama
nv: Łeezh Łichxíiʼii Hahoodzo
oc: Alabama
os: Алабамæ
pa: ਅਲਾਬਾਮਾ
pi: अलाबामा
pl: Alabama
ps: آلاباما
pt: Alabama
qu: Alabama suyu
rm: Alabama
ro: Alabama
ru: Алабама
sa: अलाबामा
sc: Alabama
sd: الاباما
se: Alabama
sh: Alabama
si: ඇලබාමා
sk: Alabama
sl: Alabama
sm: Alapama
so: Alabama
sq: Alabama
sr: Алабама
sv: Alabama
sw: Alabama
ta: அலபாமா
te: అలబామా
tg: Алабама
th: รัฐแอละแบมา
tk: Alabama
tl: Alabama
to: ʻAlapama
tr: Alabama
tt: Алабама
ug: Alabama Shitati
uk: Алабама
ur: الاباما
uz: Alabama
vi: Alabama
vo: Alabama
xh: I-Alabhama
yi: אלאבאמא
yo: Ìpínlẹ̀ Alabama
za: Alabama
zh: 亚拉巴马州

en: California
xx: California
ar: كاليفورنيا
bg: Калифорния
ca: Califòrnia
da: Californien
de: Kalifornien
eo: Kalifornio
fi: Kalifornia
fo: Kalifornia
fr: Californie
hu: Kalifornia
is: Kalifornía
lt: Kalifornija
nl: Californië
pl: Kalifornia
ru: Калифорния
sv: Kalifornien
tr: Kaliforniya

en: Florida
bg: Флорида
fr: Floride
hu: Florida
nl: Florida
pl: Floryda
sv: Florida
tr: Florida

en: Georgia state, Georgia USA, Georgia in the usa, Georgia in the united states, US-GA
fr: Géorgie (États-Unis)

en: Louisiana, US-LA
af: Louisiana
am: ሉዊዚያና
an: Loisiana
ar: لويزيانا
ay: Louisiana suyu
az: Luiziana
be: Луізіяна
bg: Луизиана
bh: लुइसियाना
bi: Louisiana
bn: লুইজিয়ানা
bo: ལུའི་ཟི་ཨཱན་ནཱ།
br: Louiziana
bs: Louisiana
ca: Louisiana
ce: Луизиана
co: Luisiana
cs: Louisiana
cv: Луизиана
cy: Louisiana
da: Louisiana
de: Louisiana
el: Λουιζιάνα
eo: Luiziano
es: Luisiana
et: Louisiana
eu: Louisiana
fa: لوئیزیانا
fi: Louisiana
fo: Louisiana
fr: Louisiane
fy: Louisiana
ga: Louisiana
gd: Louisiana
gl: Luisiana
gn: Luisiana
gu: લ્યુઇસિયાના
gv: Louisiana
ha: Louisiana
he: לואיזיאנה
hi: लुईज़ियाना
hr: Louisiana
ht: Lwizyàn
hu: Louisiana
hy: Լուիզիանա
ia: Louisiana
id: Louisiana
ie: Louisiana
ig: Luwisiánà
ik: Luisiana
io: Louisiana
is: Louisiana
it: Louisiana
iu: ᓗᐄᓰᐋᓈ
ja: ルイジアナ州
jv: Louisiana
ka: ლუიზიანა
kk: Луизиана
kn: ಲೂಯಿಸಿಯಾನ
ko: 루이지애나주
ks: لوزیانا
ku: Louisiana
kw: Louisiana
ky: Луизиана
la: Ludoviciana
lb: Louisiana
li: Louisiana
lt: Luiziana
lv: Luiziāna
mg: Louisiana
mi: Rōeihīana
mk: Луизијана
ml: ലുയീസിയാന
mn: Луизиана
mr: लुईझियाना
ms: Louisiana
my: လူဝီစီယားနားပြည်နယ်
ne: लुइजियाना
nl: Louisiana
nn: Louisiana
no: Louisiana
nv: Tónteel Biihílį́ Hahoodzo
oc: Loïsiana
os: Луизианæ
pa: ਲੂਈਜ਼ੀਆਨਾ
pi: लुइजियाना
pl: Luizjana
ps: لویزیانا
pt: Luisiana
qu: Louisiana suyu
rm: Louisiana
ro: Louisiana
ru: Луизиана
sa: लुईजियाना
sc: Louisiana
sd: لوئزيانا
se: Louisiana
sh: Louisiana
sk: Louisiana
sl: Louisiana
sq: Luiziana
sr: Луизијана
sv: Louisiana
sw: Louisiana
ta: லூசியானா
tg: Луизиана
th: รัฐลุยเซียนา
tl: Louisiana
tr: Louisiana
tt: Луизиана
ug: Loyizanna Shitati
uk: Луїзіана
ur: لوویزیانا
uz: Luiziana
vi: Louisiana
vo: Louisiana
wa: Louwiziane
xh: ILuwiziyana
yi: לואיזיאנא
yo: Louisiana
zh: 路易斯安那州

en: Mississipi, US-MS
af: Mississippi
am: ሚሲሲፒ
an: Mississippi
ar: مسيسيبي
ay: Mississippi suyu
az: Missisipi ştatı
ba: Миссисипи
be: Місісіпі
bg: Мисисипи
bh: मिसिसिपी
bi: Mississippi
bn: মিসিসিপি
bo: མི་སི་སི་ཕི།
br: Mississippi
bs: Mississippi
ca: Mississipi
ce: Миссисипи
co: Mississippi
cs: Mississippi
cv: Миссисипи
cy: Mississippi
da: Mississippi
de: Mississippi
el: Μισισίπι
eo: Misisipio
es: Misisipi
et: Mississippi osariik
eu: Mississippi
fi: Mississippi
fo: Mississippi
fr: Mississippi
fy: Mississippy
ga: Mississippi
gd: Mississippi
gl: Mississippi
gn: Misisípi
gv: Mississippi
ha: Mississippi
he: מיסיסיפי
hi: मिसिसिप्पी
hr: Mississippi
ht: Misisipi
hu: Mississippi
hy: Միսսիսիպի
ia: Mississippi
id: Mississippi
ie: Mississippi
ig: Mississippi
ik: Misisipi
io: Mississippi
is: Mississippi
it: Mississippi
iu: ᒦᓰᓰᐲ
ja: ミシシッピ州
jv: Mississippi
ka: მისისიპის შტატი
kk: Миссисипи
ko: 미시시피주
ku: Mîsîsîpî
kw: Mississippi
ky: Миссисипи
la: Mississippia
lb: Mississippi
li: Mississippi
lt: Misisipė
lv: Misisipi
mg: Mississippi
mi: Mihihipi
mk: Мисисипи
ml: മിസിസിപ്പി
mn: Миссисипи
mr: मिसिसिपी
ms: Mississippi
my: မစ္စစ္စပီပြည်နယ်
ne: मिसिसिपी
nl: Mississippi
nn: Mississippi
no: Mississippi
nv: Diichiłító Hahoodzo
oc: Mississipí
os: Миссисипи
pa: ਮਿਸੀਸਿੱਪੀ
pi: मिसिसिप्पी
pl: Missisipi
ps: میسیسیپی
pt: Mississippi
qu: Mississippi suyu
rm: Mississippi
ro: Mississippi
ru: Миссисипи
sa: मिसिसिपी
sc: Mississippi
sd: مسيسيپي
se: Mississippi
sh: Mississippi
sk: Mississippi
sl: Misisipi
sm: Misisipi
so: Mississippi
sq: Mississippi
sr: Мисисипи
sv: Mississippi
sw: Mississippi
ta: மிசிசிப்பி
tg: Миссисипӣ
th: รัฐมิสซิสซิปปี
tk: Missisipi
tl: Mississippi
tr: Mississippi
tt: Миссисипи
ug: Misisipi Shitati
uk: Міссісіпі
ur: مسیسپی
uz: Mississippi
vi: Mississippi
vo: Mississippi
xh: IMisisiphi
yi: מיסיסיפי
yo: Ìpínlẹ̀ Mississippi
zh: 密西西比州

en: South Carolina, US-SC
bg: Южна Каролина
fr: Caroline du Sud
it: Carolina del Sud
nl: Zuid-Carolina
pl: Karolina Południowa

en: Texas, US-TX
af: Texas
am: ቴክሳስ
an: Texas
ar: تكساس
ay: Texas suyu
az: Texas
ba: Техас
be: Тэхас
bg: Тексас
bh: टेक्सास
bi: Texas
bn: টেক্সাস
bo: ཋེག་ཟ་སི།
br: Texas
bs: Teksas
ca: Texas
ce: Техас
co: Texas
cs: Texas
cu: Тєѯасъ
cv: Техас
cy: Texas
da: Texas
de: Texas
el: Τέξας
eo: Teksaso
es: Texas
et: Texas
eu: Texas
fa: تگزاس
fi: Texas
fo: Texas
fr: Texas
fy: Teksas
ga: Texas
gd: Texas
gl: Texas
gn: Tehás
gu: ટેક્સસ
gv: Texas
ha: Texas
he: טקסס
hi: टेक्सस
hr: Teksas
ht: Teksas
hu: Texas
hy: Տեխաս
ia: Texas
id: Texas
ie: Texas
ig: Texas
ik: Texas
io: Texas
is: Texas
it: Texas
iu: ᑖᒃᓵᔅ
ja: テキサス州
jv: Texas
ka: ტეხასი
kk: Техас
kn: ಟೆಕ್ಸಸ್
ko: 텍사스주
ku: Teksas
kw: Teksas
la: Texia
lb: Texas
li: Texas
lo: ເທັກຊາສ
lt: Teksasas
lv: Teksasa
mg: Texas
mi: Tēkiki
mk: Тексас
ml: ടെക്സസ്
mn: Техас
mr: टेक्सास
ms: Texas
my: တက္ကဆပ်ပြည်နယ်
ne: टेक्सस
nl: Texas
nn: Texas
no: Texas
nv: Akałii Bikéyah
oc: Tèxas
os: Техас
pa: ਟੈਕਸਸ
pi: टेक्सास
pl: Teksas
ps: تکزاس
pt: Texas
qu: Texas suyu
rm: Texas
ro: Texas
ru: Техас
sa: टेक्सास्
sc: Texas
sd: ٽيڪساس
se: Texas
sh: Texas
sk: Texas
sl: Teksas
so: Texas
sq: Teksasi
sr: Тексас
sv: Texas
sw: Texas
ta: டெக்சஸ்
te: టెక్సస్
tg: Техас
th: รัฐเท็กซัส
tk: Tehas
tl: Texas
tr: Teksas
tt: Техас
ug: Téksas Shitati
uk: Техас
ur: ٹیکساس
uz: Texas
vi: Texas
vo: Täxasän
yi: טעקסאס
yo: Texas
zh: 德克萨斯州
zu: Texas

en: Gaza Strip
bg: Ивица Газа
fr: Bande de Gaza
it: Striscia di Gaza
nl: Gazastrook

en: International waters, IW
ar: مياه دولية
az: Neytral sular
be: Адкрытае мора
bg: Открито море
bn: আন্তর্জাতিক জলভাগ
br: Dourioù etrebroadel
ca: Alta mar
cs: Mezinárodní vody
da: Internationalt farvand
de: Internationale Gewässer
el: Ανοικτή θάλασσα
eo: Internacia maro
es: Alta mar
et: Rahvusvahelised veed
eu: Itsas zabal
fi: Kansainväliset vedet
fr: Haute mer, eaux internationales
he: מים בין-לאומיים
hi: अंतर्राष्ट्रीय जलक्षेत्र
hr: Otvoreno more
hy: Բաց ծով
id: Perairan internasional
io: Internacion aqui
it: Acque internazionali
ja: 公海
ka: საერთაშორისო წყლები
ko: 공해 (바다)
ky: Ачык деңиз
lt: Atviroji jūra
mk: Меѓународни води
ml: അന്താരാഷ്ട്ര സമുദ്രവിഭജനം
ms: Perairan antarabangsa
nl: Internationale wateren
nn: Internasjonalt farvatn
no: Internasjonalt farvann
pl: Morze otwarte
ps: نړیوالې اوبه
pt: Alto-mar
ro: Ape internaționale
ru: Открытое море
sh: Otvoreno more
sq: Ujërat ndërkombëtare
sv: Internationellt vatten
tg: Баҳри кушод
tl: Pandaigdigang katubigan
tr: Uluslararası sular
uk: Міжнародні води
uz: Ochiq dengiz
vi: Hải phận quốc tế
zh: 公海

en: FAO fishing areas, FAO major fishing areas, FAO inland waters
xx: FAO major fishing areas
bg: Главните Риболовни Зони ФАО
cs: Hlavních Rybolovných Oblastí FAO
da: Overordnede FAO-Fiskeriområder
de: FAO-Fischereigebiete, FAO major fishing areas
el: Μείζονες Αλιευτικές Ζώνες FAO
es: Principales zonas pesqueras de la FAO, Principales áreas de pesca de la FAO
et: FAO Peamiste Püügipiirkondade
fi: FAO-Pääkalastusalueista
fr: Principales zones de pêche de la FAO, Zone de pêche, Zone de pêche FAO
ga: Mórlimistéir Iascaireachta FAO
hr: ribolovno područje FAO, FAO, ribolovno područje
hu: Fő FAO Halászati területek, FAO halászati körzetek
it: Principali zone di pesca FAO
lt: FAO Pagrindiniame Žvejybos Rajonu
lv: FAO Galveno Zvejas Apgabalos
mt: Taż-żoni Prinċipali Tas-sajd Tal-FAO
nl: Grote visgebieden van de FAO, FAO major fishing areas
pl: Głównych Obszarów Połowowych FAO, Obszary połowowe FAO
pt: Zonas principais de pesca FAO
ro: Principalele Zone de Pescuit FAO
sk: FAO Hlavných Oblastí Rybolovu
sl: Glavnih Ribolovnih Območij FAO

en: FAO 1, FAO 01, FAO inland waters 1
xx: FAO 1, FAO 01

en: FAO 2, FAO 02, FAO inland waters 2
xx: FAO 2, FAO 02

en: FAO 3, FAO 03, FAO inland waters 3
xx: FAO 3, FAO 03

en: FAO 4, FAO 04, FAO inland waters 4
xx: FAO 4, FAO 04
fr: FAO 4, FAO 04, FAO n°04

en: FAO 5, FAO 05, FAO inland waters 5
xx: FAO 5, FAO 05

en: FAO 6, FAO 06, FAO inland waters 6
xx: FAO 6, FAO 06

en: FAO 8, FAO 08, FAO inland waters 8
xx: FAO 8, FAO 08

en: Arctic sea
xx: FAO 18
ar: بحر القطب الشمالي
az: Arktik dənizi
bg: Арктически океан
ca: Mar Àrtic
cs: Severní ledový oceán, Arktický oceán
da: Arktiske Ocean
de: Arktisches Meer, Arktischer Ozean
el: Αρκτικός Ωκεανός
eo: Arkta maro
es: Océano Ártico, Mar Ártico
et: Arktika meri
fa: دریای قطب شمال
fi: Jäämeri, Pohjoinen jäämeri
fr: Océan Arctique, Mer Arctique
he: האוקיינוס הארקטי
hi: आर्कटिक सागर
hr: Arktičko more, Arktički ocean
hu: Jeges-tenger, Északi-sarkvidéki tenger
id: Laut Arktik
it: Mar Glaciale Artico, Oceano Artico
ja: 北極海
ko: 북극해
lt: Arkties vandenynas
lv: Ziemeļu Ledus okeāns
nl: Noordelijke IJszee, Arctische Zee
pl: Ocean Arktyczny, Morze Arktyczne
pt: Oceano Ártico, Mar Ártico
ro: Oceanul Arctic
ru: Северный Ледовитый океан
sk: Severný ľadový oceán
sl: Arktično morje, Severno ledeno morje
sq: Oqeani Arktik
sr: Северно ледено море, Арктички океан
sv: Arktiska oceanen, Norra ishavet
th: มหาสมุทรอาร์กติก
tr: Arktik Denizi, Kuzey Buz Denizi
uk: Північний Льодовитий океан
ur: بحر منجمد شمالی
vi: Bắc Băng Dương
zh: 北冰洋

en: Atlantic Ocean, Atlantic
af: Atlantiese Oseaan
ar: المحيط الأطلسي
az: Atlantik okeanı
bg: Атлантически океан
ca: Oceà Atlàntic
cs: Atlantský oceán, Atlantik
da: Atlantiske Ocean
de: Atlantischer Ozean, Atlantik
el: Ατλαντικός Ωκεανός
eo: Atlantika Oceano
es: Océano Atlántico, Atlántico
et: Atlandi ookean
fa: اقیانوس اطلس
fi: Atlantin valtameri, Atlantti
fr: Océan Atlantique, Atlantique
he: האוקיינוס האטלנטי
hi: अटलांटिक महासागर
hr: Atlantski ocean, Atlantik
hu: Atlanti-óceán
id: Samudra Atlantik
it: Oceano Atlantico, Atlantico
ja: 大西洋
ko: 대서양
lt: Atlanto vandenynas, Atlantas
lv: Atlantijas okeāns, Atlantiskais okeāns
mk: Атлантски Океан
ms: Lautan Atlantik
nl: Atlantische Oceaan
no: Atlanterhavet
pl: Ocean Atlantycki, Atlantyk
pt: Oceano Atlântico, Atlântico
ro: Oceanul Atlantic, Atlantic
ru: Атлантический океан
sk: Atlantický oceán, Atlantik
sl: Atlantski ocean, Atlantik
sq: Oqeani Atlantik
sr: Атлантски океан
sv: Atlanten, Atlantiska oceanen
th: มหาสมุทรแอตแลนติก
tr: Atlantik Okyanusu
uk: Атлантичний океан
ur: بحر اوقیانوس
vi: Đại Tây Dương
zh: 大西洋